California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(6) “District and municipal public hospital” means a nondesignated public hospital, as defined in
 subdivision (k) of Section 14184.10, that is a contracted network provider of one or more Medi-Cal managed care plans, and that had an approved project plan under the PRIME program established pursuant to Section 14184.50 or is otherwise authorized to participate in a quality incentive directed payment program pursuant to the applicable terms of federal approval obtained by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (h).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 68.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.45.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for covered benefits under its contract, as applicable, a Medi-Cal managed care plan shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Make a good faith effort to contract with at least one National Cancer Institute (NCI)-designated comprehensive cancer center, site affiliated with the NCI Community Oncology Research Program (NCORP), or qualifying academic cancer center, within its contracted provider network and its subcontracted provider network, if applicable, within each county in which the Medi-Cal managed care plan operates, for provision of services to any eligible enrollee diagnosed with a complex cancer diagnosis. For purposes of this paragraph, the NCI-designated comprehensive cancer center, NCORP-affiliated site, or
 qualifying academic cancer center shall enroll in the Medi-Cal program if there is a state-level enrollment pathway, or the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall vet the qualifications of the facility to ensure they can meet the standards of participation required to contract with a Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(2) (A) Allow any eligible enrollee diagnosed with a complex cancer diagnosis to request a referral to receive medically necessary services through any of the following in-network providers unless the enrollee chooses a different cancer treatment provider:

(i) An NCI-designated comprehensive cancer center.

(ii) An NCORP-affiliated site.

(iii) A qualifying academic cancer center.

(B) (i) If the Medi-Cal managed care plan is unsuccessful in its good faith contracting efforts pursuant to paragraph (1), the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall allow an enrollee to request a referral to receive medically necessary services through an out-of-network NCI-designated comprehensive cancer center, out-of-network NCORP-affiliated site, or out-of-network qualifying academic cancer center, unless the enrollee chooses a different cancer treatment provider.

(ii) Clause (i) shall only apply if the Medi-Cal managed care plan and the out-of-network NCI-designated comprehensive cancer center, out-of-network NCORP-affiliated site, or out-of-network qualifying academic cancer center come to agreement with respect to payment.

(3) (A) After approving a referral request pursuant to paragraph (2), allow an eligible enrollee
 diagnosed with a complex cancer diagnosis to access oncology, hematology, or other relevant specialists through a contracted NCI-designated comprehensive cancer center, a contracted NCORP-affiliated site, or a contracted qualifying academic cancer center, for the enrollee’s condition and identified needs as medically necessary.

(B) If the NCI-designated comprehensive cancer center, NCORP-affiliated site, or qualifying academic cancer center refers an enrollee with a complex cancer condition to an out-of-network specialist pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), this paragraph shall only apply if the Medi-Cal managed care plan and the out-of-network specialist come to an agreement with respect to payment.

(4) A denial of an enrollee’s referral request shall be based upon a determination by the treating provider that the request to receive services at an NCI–designated
 comprehensive cancer center, or an NCORP-affiliated site, or a qualifying academic cancer center is not medically necessary, the requested services are not available at, or not applicable to the enrollee’s cancer diagnosis at, the requested NCI-designated comprehensive cancer center, NCORP-affiliated site, or qualifying academic cancer center, or the NCI-designated comprehensive cancer center, NCORP-affiliated site, or qualifying academic cancer center is an out-of-network provider and the Medi-Cal managed care plan and the out-of-network NCI-designated comprehensive cancer center, NCORP-affiliated site, or qualifying academic cancer center are unable to come to agreement with the respect to payment.

(5) Ensure that the services of an NCI-designated comprehensive cancer center, NCORP-affiliated site, or qualifying academic cancer center available to an eligible enrollee are sufficient in amount, duration, and scope as medically necessary for
 the treatment of the enrollee’s condition.

(6) Refrain from arbitrarily denying or reducing the amount, duration, or scope of required services solely because of diagnosis, type of illness, or condition of the enrollee.

(b) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall notify all enrollees of their right to request a referral to access care through an NCI-designated comprehensive cancer center, NCORP-affiliated site, or qualifying academic cancer center, if they are diagnosed with a complex cancer diagnosis.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) (A) “Complex cancer diagnosis” means a diagnosis for which there is no standard FDA-approved treatment or for which known highly effective therapy for metastatic
 cancer has failed and any of the following diagnoses: hematological malignancies, acute leukemia, advanced, relapsed, refractory non-Hodgkin lymphoma and multiple myeloma, including BPDCN and T-cell leukemias and lymphomas, and advanced stage, relapsed solid tumors refractory to standard FDA-approved treatment options, advanced stage rare solid tumors for which there is no known effective standard treatment options, or any other condition as determined pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d). “Advanced stage” cancer means stage IV metastatic cancer.

(B) The department is authorized to periodically update and further define “complex cancer diagnosis” pursuant to the process outlined in subdivision (d).

(2) “Eligible enrollee” means an individual enrolled with a particular Medi-Cal managed care plan who receives a complex cancer diagnosis.

(3) “National Cancer Institute (NCI) Community Oncology Research Program (NCORP)-affiliated site” is a cancer center that has received an approved grant from NCI through NCORP that provides cancer clinical trials and care delivery studies.

(4) “NCI-designated comprehensive cancer center” is a cancer center that meets ongoing standards for cancer prevention, clinical services, and research, as determined by regular reviews and evaluations by NCI.

(5) “Qualifying academic cancer center” is a research and clinical cancer center that meets all the following criteria:

(A) It is an institution with a medical oncology or hematology subspecialty expertise in each of the diagnoses included in paragraph (1).

(B) It has a portfolio of phases 1, 2, and 3 clinical trials available for eligible enrollees.

(C) It provides fellowship programs in medical oncology, hematology or hematological oncology, radiation oncology, or a surgical oncology specialty.

(D) It provides inpatient and outpatient supportive care services.

(E) It covers clinical, anatomic, and molecular pathology with subspecialty expertise for each of the cancer types included in paragraph (1).

(F) It provides a program accredited by the American College of Surgeons (ACS) Commission on Cancer (CoC).

(G) It has accreditation for the main campus by the Foundation for the Accreditation of Cellular Therapy.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, information notices, or other similar guidance, without taking further regulatory action.

(2) The department, in consultation with stakeholders, shall develop a process for updating and further defining a “complex cancer diagnosis” on a periodic basis.

(e) The department shall seek any federal approvals it deems necessary to implement this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise
 jeopardized.

(f) For purposes of implementing this section, the department may enter into an exclusive or nonexclusive contract, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 232.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, but no sooner than July 1, 2019, the Cost-Based Reimbursement Clinic Directed Payment Program shall be in operation.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Cost-based reimbursement clinics” or “CBRCs” have the same meaning as the providers described in subdivision (a) of Section 14105.24.

(2) “Cost-Based Reimbursement Clinic Directed Payment Program” or “CBRC DPP” or “program,” means a directed payment initiative implemented pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 438.6 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations or other applicable federal
 authority that requires affected Medi-Cal managed care plans to compensate CBRCs that are network providers for all network contract services provided to enrollees of the applicable Medi-Cal managed care plan as those clinics would be reimbursed according to the Medi-Cal cost-based, fee-for-service methodology as described in Section 14105.24. Services provided to enrollees who are dually eligible for both the Medicare and Medi-Cal programs are excluded for purposes of this program.

(3) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” or “plan” has the same meaning as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (m) of Section 14197.4.

(4) “Network provider” has the same meaning as that term is defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (m) of Section 14197.4.

(c) (1) The department shall increase the capitation amounts
 paid to affected plans in each fiscal year by the amount the department deems necessary for the plan to comply with the requirements of this section, subject to the availability of nonfederal share funding described in subdivision (d).

(2) The directed payment amounts paid under this section shall not supplant amounts that would otherwise be payable by a plan to a CBRC for an applicable fiscal year, and the plan shall not impose a fee or retention amount that would result in a direct or indirect reduction to the amounts required under this section.

(d) The nonfederal share of the increases described in subdivision (c) may be funded through voluntary, intergovernmental transfers from affected counties or other public entities pursuant to Section 14164. Subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, the first thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) of nonfederal share in each
 fiscal year, or any lesser amount as determined by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), shall be financed by other state funds appropriated to the department for this purpose. Upon providing any intergovernmental transfer of funds, each transferring entity shall certify, in the form and manner specified by the department, that the transferred funds qualify for federal financial participation pursuant to applicable Medicaid laws. Any intergovernmental transfer of funds made pursuant to this section shall be considered voluntary for purposes of all federal laws. Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not assess the fee described in subdivision (d) of Section 14301.4 nor any other similar fee.

(e) (1) The department shall consult with the affected counties on a periodic basis, as determined appropriate by the department, to assess the extent to which implementation of the directed payments
 under this section in a particular fiscal year is likely to be federally approved and remains financially and programmatically supportive of the Medi-Cal program.

(2) After consulting with the affected counties pursuant to paragraph (1), the department may do either of the following:

(A) Reduce the total size of CBRC DPP payments to be made in that applicable fiscal year. If the department elects to reduce the total size of payments, the amount of state funding required to be provided first as nonfederal share for an applicable fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (d) shall be reduced as calculated and determined by the department.

(B) Elect to not implement CBRC DPP payments for an applicable fiscal year or years.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, for
 any fiscal year in which the department implements the CBRC DPP payments, the amount of state funding provided as described in subdivision (d) shall not be included in the total revenues as defined in paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 17612.5.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan letters, provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(h) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 34, Sec. 32.   (AB 1810)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Children’s hospital” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 10727.

(2) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, for dates of service no sooner than July 1, 2024, the department shall establish a directed payment reimbursement methodology, or revise one or more existing directed payment reimbursement methodologies, applicable to children’s hospitals. Medi-Cal managed care plans shall reimburse children’s hospitals in
 accordance with the requirements of the directed payment arrangement established by the department pursuant to this section and guidance issued pursuant to subdivision (e).

(c) The department shall establish the form and manner of the directed payments authorized pursuant to this section, in consultation with representatives of children’s hospitals and in accordance with the requirements for directed payment arrangements described in Section 438.6(c) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations and any associated federal guidance.

(d) In implementing this section, the department shall seek any federal approvals that it deems necessary. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(e) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, information notices, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(f) The department shall develop the methodologies and parameters for the payments implemented pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) and may revise the methodologies and parameters for purposes, including, but not limited to, obtaining or maintaining any necessary federal approvals as required by subdivision (d). 

(g) Commencing no sooner than July 1, 2024, and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, one hundred fifteen million dollars ($115,000,000) annually shall be continuously
 appropriated to the department from the General Fund to support the payments implemented pursuant to this section, except that such amount may be adjusted pursuant to subdivision (h).

(h) If the Protect Access to Healthcare Act of 2024 (A.G. No. 23-0024) is approved by the voters, and if children’s hospitals receive increased reimbursement rates or payments pursuant to Section 14199.108, 14199.108.3, 14199.112, or 14199.116, or if children’s hospitals receive increased reimbursement rates or payments funded pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14105.200, then the amount available for directed payments to children’s hospitals as specified in subdivision (g) and the amount directed pursuant to subdivision (c) may be reduced by the estimated total amount of such increases, as determined by the Department of Health Care Services, in an amount not to exceed seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) annually.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature that the payments implemented pursuant to this section are to augment amounts that would otherwise be payable to children’s hospitals by a Medi-Cal managed plan or the department. It is not the intent of the Legislature that the payments implemented pursuant to this section replace amounts that would otherwise be payable by a Medi-Cal managed care plan or the department to children’s hospitals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 69.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.7.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if the director finds that an entity that contracts with the department for the delivery of health care services (contractor), including a Medi-Cal managed care plan or a prepaid health plan, fails to comply with contract requirements, state or federal law or regulations, or the state plan or approved waivers, or for other good cause, the director may terminate the contract or impose sanctions as set forth in this section.

(2) Good cause includes, but is not limited to, a finding of deficiency that results in improper denial or delay in the delivery of health care services, potential endangerment to patient care, disruption in the contractor’s provider network, failure to approve continuity of care,
 that claims accrued or to accrue have not or will not be recompensed, or a delay in required contractor reporting to the department.

(b) The director may identify findings of noncompliance or good cause through any means, including, but not limited to, findings in audits, investigations, contract compliance reviews, quality improvement system monitoring, routine monitoring, facility site surveys, encounter and provider data submissions, grievances and appeals, network adequacy reviews, assessments of timely access requirements, reviews of utilization data, health plan rating systems, fair hearing decisions, complaints from beneficiaries and other stakeholders, whistleblowers, and contractor self-disclosures.

(c) (1) Except when the director determines there is an immediate threat to the health of Medi-Cal beneficiaries receiving health care services from the
 contractor, at the request of the contractor, the department shall hold a public hearing to commence 30 days after notice of intent to terminate the contract has been received by the contractor.

(2) The department shall present evidence at the hearing showing good cause for the termination.

(3) The department shall assign an administrative law judge who shall provide a written recommendation to the department on the termination of the contract within 30 days after conclusion of the hearing.

(4) (A) Reasonable notice of the hearing shall be given to the contractor, Medi-Cal beneficiaries receiving services through the contractor, and other interested parties, including any other person and organization the director may deem necessary.

(B) The notice shall state the effective date of, and the reason for, the termination.

(d) In lieu of contract termination, the director shall have the power and authority to require or impose a plan of correction and issue one or more of the following sanctions against a contractor for findings of noncompliance or good cause, including, but not limited to, those specified in subdivision (a):

(1) Temporarily or permanently suspend enrollment and marketing activities.

(2) Require the contractor to suspend or terminate contractor personnel or subcontractors.

(3) Issue one or more of the temporary suspension orders set forth in subdivision (j).

(4) Impose temporary management
 consistent with the requirements specified in Section 438.706 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(5) Suspend default enrollment of enrollees who do not select a contractor for the delivery of health care services.

(6) Impose civil monetary sanctions consistent with the dollar amounts and violations specified in Section 438.704 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as follows:

(A) A limit of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each determination of the following:

(i) The contractor fails to provide medically necessary services that the contractor is required to provide, under law or under its contract with the department, to an enrollee covered under the contract.

(ii) The contractor misrepresents or falsifies information to an enrollee, potential enrollee, or health care provider.

(iii) The contractor distributes directly, or indirectly through an agent or independent contractor, marketing materials that have not been approved by the state or that contain false or materially misleading information.

(B) A limit of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each determination of the following:

(i) The contractor conducts an act of discrimination against an enrollee on the basis of their health status or need for health care services. This includes termination of enrollment or refusal to reenroll a beneficiary, except as permitted under the Medicaid program, or a practice that would reasonably be expected to discourage enrollment by beneficiaries whose medical
 condition or history indicates probable need for substantial future medical services.

(ii) The contractor misrepresents or falsifies information that it furnishes to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or to the department.

(C) A limit of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each beneficiary the director determines was not enrolled because of a discriminatory practice under clause (i) of subparagraph (B). This sanction is subject to the overall limit of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) under subparagraph (B).

(e) Notwithstanding the monetary sanctions imposed for the violations set forth in paragraph (6) of subdivision (d), the director may impose monetary sanctions in accordance with this section based on any of the following:

(1) The contractor violates a federal or state statute or regulation.

(2) The contractor violates a provision of its contract with the department.

(3) The contractor violates a provision of the state plan or approved waivers.

(4) The contractor fails to meet quality metrics or benchmarks established by the department. Any changes to the minimum quality metrics or benchmarks made by the department that are effective on or after January 1, 2020, shall be established in advance of the applicable reporting or performance measurement period, unless required by the federal government.

(5) The contractor fails to demonstrate that it has an adequate network to meet anticipated utilization in its service area.

(6) The contractor fails to comply with network adequacy standards, including, but not limited to, time and distance, timely access, and provider-to-beneficiary ratio requirements pursuant to standards and formulae that are set forth in federal or state law, regulation, state plan, or contract and that are posted in advance to the department’s internet website.

(7) The contractor fails to comply with the requirements of a corrective action plan.

(8) The contractor fails to submit timely and accurate network provider data.

(9) The director identifies deficiencies in the contractor’s delivery of health care services.

(10) The director identifies deficiencies in the contractor’s operations,
 including the timely payment of claims.

(11) The contractor fails to comply with reporting requirements, including, but not limited to, those set forth in Section 53862 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(12) The contractor fails to timely and accurately process grievances or appeals.

(f) (1) Monetary sanctions imposed pursuant to subdivision (e) may be separately and independently assessed and may also be assessed for each day the contractor fails to correct an identified deficiency. For a deficiency that impacts beneficiaries, each beneficiary impacted constitutes a separate violation. Monetary sanctions shall be assessed in the following amounts:

(A) Up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for a first
 violation.

(B) Up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for a second violation.

(C) Up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each subsequent violation.

(2) For monetary sanctions imposed on a contractor that is funded from one or more of the realigned accounts described in paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (n), the department shall calculate a percentage of the funds attributable to the contractor to be offset per month pursuant to paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (n) until the amount offset equals the amount of the penalty imposed pursuant to paragraph (1).

(g) When assessing sanctions pursuant to this section, the director shall determine the appropriate amount of the penalty for each violation based upon one or
 more of the following nonexclusive factors:

(1) The nature, scope, and gravity of the violation, including the potential harm or impact on beneficiaries.

(2) The good or bad faith of the contractor.

(3) The contractor’s history of violations.

(4) The willfulness of the violation.

(5) The nature and extent to which the contractor cooperated with the department’s investigation.

(6) The nature and extent to which the contractor aggravated or mitigated any injury or damage caused by the violation.

(7) The nature and extent to which the contractor has taken
 corrective action to ensure the violation will not recur.

(8) The financial status of the contractor, including whether the sanction will affect the ability of the contractor to come into compliance.

(9) The financial cost of the health care service that was denied, delayed, or modified.

(10) Whether the violation is an isolated incident.

(11) The amount of the penalty necessary to deter similar violations in the future.

(12) Other mitigating factors presented by the contractor.

(h) (1) Except in exigent circumstances in which there is an immediate risk to the health of beneficiaries, as determined by
 the department, the director shall give reasonable written notice to the contractor of the intention to impose any of the sanctions authorized by this section and others who may be directly interested, including any other persons and organizations the director may deem necessary.

(2) The notice shall include the effective date for, the duration of, and the reason for each sanction proposed by the director.

(3) A contractor may request the department to meet and confer with the contractor to discuss information and evidence that may impact the director’s final decision to impose sanctions authorized by this section.

(4) The director shall grant a request to meet and confer prior to issuance of a final sanction if the contractor submits the request in writing to the department no later than two business days after the
 contractor’s receipt of the director’s notice of intention to impose sanctions.

(i) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), the director shall terminate a contract with a contractor that the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services has determined does not meet the requirements for participation in the Medicaid program contained in Subchapter XIX (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(j) (1) The department may make one or more of the following temporary suspension orders as an immediate sanction:

(A) Temporarily suspend enrollment activities.

(B) Temporarily suspend marketing activities.

(C) Require the contractor to
 temporarily suspend specified personnel of the contractor.

(D) Require the contractor to temporarily suspend participation by a specified subcontractor.

(2) The temporary suspension orders shall be effective no earlier than 20 days after the notice specified in subdivision (k).

(k) (1) Prior to issuing a temporary suspension order, or temporarily withholding funds pursuant to subdivision (o), the department shall provide the contractor with a written notice.

(2) The notice shall state the department’s intent to impose a temporary suspension or temporary withhold and specify the nature and effective date of the temporary suspension or temporary withhold.

(3) The
 contractor shall have 30 calendar days from the date of receipt of the notice to file a written appeal with the department.

(4) Upon receipt of a written appeal filed by the contractor, the department shall, within 15 days, set the matter for hearing, which shall be held as soon as possible but not later than 30 days after receipt of the notice of hearing by the contractor.

(5) The hearing may be continued at the request of the contractor if a continuance is necessary to permit presentation of an adequate defense.

(6) The temporary suspension order shall remain in effect until the hearing is completed and the department has made a final determination on the merits. However, the temporary suspension order shall be deemed vacated if the director fails to make a final determination on the merits within 60 days of the
 close of the record for the matter.

(7) The department shall stay imposition of a temporary withhold, pursuant to subdivision (o), until the hearing is completed and the department has made a final determination on the merits within 60 days of the close of the record for the matter.

(l) (1) A contractor may request a hearing in connection with sanctions applied pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e) within 15 working days after the notice of the effective date of the sanctions has been given by sending a letter so stating to the address specified in the notice.

(2) The department shall stay collection of monetary sanctions upon receipt of the request for a hearing.

(3) Collection of the sanction shall remain stayed until the
 effective date of the final decision of the department.

(m) Except as otherwise provided in this section, all hearings to review the imposition of sanctions, including temporary suspension orders, the withholding or offsetting of funds pursuant to subdivision (n), or the temporary withholding of funds pursuant to subdivision (o) shall be held pursuant to the procedures set forth in Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code.

(n) (1) If the director imposes monetary sanctions pursuant to this section on a contractor, except for a contractor described in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, the amount of the sanction may be collected by withholding the amount from capitation or other associated payments owed to the contractor.

(2) If the director imposes monetary sanctions on a contractor that is
 funded from the Mental Health Subaccount, the Mental Health Equity Subaccount, the Vehicle License Collection Account of the Local Revenue Fund, or the Mental Health Account, the director may offset the monetary sanctions from the respective account. The offset is subject to paragraph (2) of subdivision (q).

(3) If the director imposes monetary sanctions on a contractor that is funded from the Behavioral Health Subaccount of the Local Revenue Fund 2011, the director may offset the monetary sanctions from that account from the distribution attributable to the applicable contractor. The offset is subject to paragraph (2) of subdivision (q).

(4) If the director imposes monetary sanctions on a contractor that is funded from another mental health or substance use disorder realignment fund from which the Controller is authorized to make distributions to the contractor, the director may
 offset the monetary sanctions from these funds if the funds described in paragraphs (2) and (3) are insufficient for the purposes described in this subdivision, as appropriate. The offset is subject to paragraph (2) of subdivision (q).

(5) (A) If the director imposes monetary sanctions pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 5963.04, the director may offset the monetary sanctions from the Behavioral Health Services Fund from the distribution attributable to the applicable contractor.

(B) With respect to an individual contractor, the department shall not collect via offset more than 25 percent of the total amount of the funds distributed from the Behavioral Health Services Fund that are attributable to the contractor in a given month.

(C) If the department is not able to collect the full amount of
 monetary sanctions imposed on a contractor in a given month, the department shall continue to offset the amounts attributable to the contractor in subsequent months until the full amount of monetary sanctions has been collected. The offset is subject to paragraph (3) of subdivision (q).

(o) (1) (A) Whenever the department determines that a mental health plan or an entity that contracts with the department to provide Drug Medi-Cal services has violated state or federal law, a requirement of this chapter, Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), Chapter 8.8 (commencing with Section 14600), or Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700), or any regulations, the state plan, a term or condition of an approved waiver, or a provision of its contract with the department, the department may temporarily withhold payments of federal financial participation and payments from the accounts listed in paragraphs
 (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (n).

(B) The department shall temporarily withhold amounts it deems necessary to ensure the mental health plan or the entity that contracts with the department to provide Drug Medi-Cal services promptly corrects the violation.

(C) The department shall release the temporarily withheld funds when it determines the mental health plan or the entity that contracts with the department to provide Drug Medi-Cal services has come into compliance.

(2) (A) A mental health plan or an entity that contracts with the department to provide Drug Medi-Cal services may appeal the imposition of a temporary withhold pursuant to this subdivision in accordance with the procedures described in subdivisions (k) and (m).

(B) Imposition of a temporary withhold shall be stayed until the effective date of the final decision of the department.

(p) This section shall be read in conjunction with, and apply in addition to, any other applicable law that authorizes the department to impose sanctions or otherwise take remedial action upon contractors.

(q) (1) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, nonfederal moneys collected by the department pursuant to this section, except for moneys collected from a contractor funded from one or more of the realigned accounts described in paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (n), shall be deposited into the General Fund for use and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to address workforce issues in the Medi-Cal program and improve access to care in the Medi-Cal program.

(B) Beginning July 1, 2024, and continuing until June 30, 2027, unless otherwise specified in law, nonfederal moneys collected by the department pursuant to this section, except for moneys collected from a contractor funded from one or more of the realigned accounts described in paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (n), shall be deposited into the General Fund for use and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the nonfederal share of Medi-Cal costs for health care services furnished to children, adults, seniors, and persons with disabilities, and persons dually eligible for the Medi-Cal program and the Medicare Program.

(2) (A) Monetary sanctions imposed via offset on a contractor that is funded from one or more of the realigned accounts described in paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (n) shall be redeposited into the account from
 which the monetary sanctions were offset pursuant to paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (n).

(B) The department shall notify the Department of Finance of the percentage reduction for the affected county.

(C) The Department of Finance shall subsequently notify the Controller, and the Controller shall redistribute the monetary sanction amount to nonsanctioned counties based on each county’s prorated share of the monthly base allocations from the realigned account.

(D) With respect to an individual contractor, the department shall not collect via offset more than 25 percent of the total amount of the funds distributed from the applicable account or accounts that are attributable to the contractor in a given month.

(E) If the department is not
 able to collect the full amount of monetary sanctions imposed on a contractor funded from one or more of the realigned accounts described in paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (n) in a given month, the department shall continue to offset the amounts attributable to the contractor in subsequent months until the full amount of monetary sanctions has been collected.

(3) Monetary sanctions imposed via offset on a contractor pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 5963.04 shall be redeposited into the account from which the monetary sanctions were offset pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (n).

(r) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan
 or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions without taking any further regulatory action.

(s) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that necessary federal approvals have been obtained and that federal financial participation is available.

(t) For purposes of this section, “contractor” means an individual, organization, or entity that enters into a contract with the department to provide services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries or other individuals receiving behavioral health services, as applicable, pursuant to any of the following:

(1) Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3), including dental managed care programs developed pursuant to Section 14087.46.

(2) Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5).

(3) Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96).

(4) Article 2.82 (commencing with Section 14087.98).

(5) Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088).

(6) Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089).

(7) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), including dental managed care plans.

(8) Chapter 8.9 (commencing with Section 14700).
